Washington statutes.
RCW 18.51.440

Receivership—Judicial hearing.

Upon receipt of a petition for receivership, the court shall hear the matter within fourteen days. Temporary relief may be obtained under chapter 7.40 RCW and other applicable laws. In all actions arising under RCW 18.51.410 through 18.51.530, the posting of a certified copy of the summons and petition in a conspicuous place in the nursing home shall constitute service of those documents upon the respondent.

[ 1989 c 372 s 11; 1987 c 476 s 13.]